Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB1273.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 8117(d)(2) of Title 74 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a subparagraph to read:§ 8117. Electronic toll collection.* * *(d) Privacy of electronic toll collection information.--* * *(2) Paragraph (1) shall not be deemed to do any of the following:* * *(iv) Preclude the provision of information to law enforcement officials for the purpose of assisting in the recovery of abducted children and missing persons who are 123456789101112131415161718 at a special risk of harm or injury as identified through the Pennsylvania Amber Alert System or Missing Endangered Person Advisory System established under the act of November 24, 2004 (P.L.1270, No.153), referred to as the Pennsylvania Amber Alert System Law, or any successor system established by law.* * *Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20260SB1273PN1610 - 2 - 12345678